test/src/gt-norm-yamls/V-lex-der-spellad_gt-norm.gen.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-dict-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-dict-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-dict-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-dict-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:

  Verb - spellâđ: # MLO, checked
    spellâđ+V+Inf: spellâđ
    spellâđ+V+Der/Pass+V+Inf: spelluđ
    spellâđ+V+Der/Pass+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: spelluum
    spellâđ+V+Der/Pass+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: spiälloo
    spellâđ+V+Der/Pass+V+Ind+Prs+Du1: spiällojeen
    spellâđ+V+Der/Pass+V+Ind+Prs+Pl3: spiällojeh
    spellâđ+V+Der/Pass+V+Ind+Prs+ConNeg: spelluu
    spellâđ+V+Der/Pass+V+Ind+Prt+Sg1: spiällojim
    spellâđ+V+Der/Pass+V+Ind+Prt+Sg3: spellui
    spellâđ+V+Der/Pass+V+Ind+Prt+Pl3: spiällojii
    spellâđ+V+Der/st+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: spelâstâm
    spellâđ+V+Der/st+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: speelâst
    spellâđ+V+Der/st+V+Ind+Prs+Du1: spelâsteen
    spellâđ+V+Der/st+V+Ind+Prs+Pl3: spelâsteh
    spellâđ+V+Der/st+V+Ind+Prs+ConNeg: speelâst
    spellâđ+V+Der/st+V+Ind+Prt+Sg1: spelâstim
    spellâđ+V+Der/st+V+Ind+Prt+Sg3:  spelâstij
    spellâđ+V+Der/st+V+Ind+Prt+Pl3:  spelâstii
    spellâđ+V+Der/d+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1:  spelâdâm
    spellâđ+V+Der/d+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3:  speelâd
    spellâđ+V+Der/d+V+Ind+Prs+Du1:  spelâdeen
    spellâđ+V+Der/d+V+Ind+Prs+Pl3:  spelâdeh
    spellâđ+V+Der/d+V+Ind+Prs+ConNeg:  speelâd
    spellâđ+V+Der/d+V+Ind+Prt+Sg1:  spelâdim
    spellâđ+V+Der/d+V+Ind+Prt+Sg3:  spelâdij
    spellâđ+V+Der/d+V+Ind+Prt+Pl3:  spelâdii
    spellâđ+V+Der/tt+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1:  spelâttâm
    spellâđ+V+Der/tt+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3:  speelât
    spellâđ+V+Der/tt+V+Ind+Prs+Du1:  spelâtteen
    spellâđ+V+Der/tt+V+Ind+Prs+Pl3:  spelâtteh
    spellâđ+V+Der/tt+V+Ind+Prs+ConNeg:  speelât
    spellâđ+V+Der/tt+V+Ind+Prt+Sg1:  spelâttim
    spellâđ+V+Der/tt+V+Ind+Prt+Sg3:  spelâttij
    spellâđ+V+Der/tt+V+Ind+Prt+Pl3:  spelâttii
    spellâđ+V+Der/l+V+Inf: spellâliđ
    spellâđ+V+Der/l+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: spellâlâm
    spellâđ+V+Der/l+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: spellâl
    spellâđ+V+Der/l+V+Ind+Prs+Du1: spellâleen
    spellâđ+V+Der/l+V+Ind+Prs+Pl3: spellâleh
    spellâđ+V+Der/l+V+Ind+Prs+ConNeg: spellâl
    spellâđ+V+Der/l+V+Ind+Prt+Sg1: spellâlim
    spellâđ+V+Der/l+V+Ind+Prt+Sg3: spellâlij
    spellâđ+V+Der/l+V+Ind+Prt+Pl3: spellâlii
    spellâđ+V+Der/InchL+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1:  spelâškuáđám
    spellâđ+V+Der/InchL+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3:  spelâškuát
    spellâđ+V+Der/InchL+V+Ind+Prs+Du1:  spelâškyetteen
    spellâđ+V+Der/InchL+V+Ind+Prs+Pl3:  [spelâškyeteh, spelâškyetih]
    spellâđ+V+Der/InchL+V+Ind+Prs+ConNeg:  spelâškyeđe
    spellâđ+V+Der/InchL+V+Ind+Prt+Sg1:  spelâškuottim
    spellâđ+V+Der/InchL+V+Ind+Prt+Sg3:  spelâškuođij
    spellâđ+V+Der/InchL+V+Ind+Prt+Pl3:  spelâškuottii


  Verb - čivgâđ: # MLO, checked
    čivgâđ+V+Inf: čivgâđ
    čivgâđ+V+Der/Pass+V+Inf: čivguđ
    čivgâđ+V+Der/Pass+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: čivguum
    čivgâđ+V+Der/Pass+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: čivgoo
    čivgâđ+V+Der/Pass+V+Ind+Prs+Du1: čivgojeen
    čivgâđ+V+Der/Pass+V+Ind+Prs+Pl3: čivgojeh
    čivgâđ+V+Der/Pass+V+Ind+Prs+ConNeg: čivguu
    čivgâđ+V+Der/Pass+V+Ind+Prt+Sg1: čivgojim
    čivgâđ+V+Der/Pass+V+Ind+Prt+Sg3: čivgui
    čivgâđ+V+Der/Pass+V+Ind+Prt+Pl3: čivgojii
    čivgâđ+V+Der/st+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: čivgâstâm
    čivgâđ+V+Der/st+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: čiivgâst
    čivgâđ+V+Der/st+V+Ind+Prs+Du1: čivgâsteen
    čivgâđ+V+Der/st+V+Ind+Prs+Pl3: čivgâsteh
    čivgâđ+V+Der/st+V+Ind+Prs+ConNeg: čiivgâst
    čivgâđ+V+Der/st+V+Ind+Prt+Sg1: čivgâstim
    čivgâđ+V+Der/st+V+Ind+Prt+Sg3:  čivgâstij
    čivgâđ+V+Der/st+V+Ind+Prt+Pl3:  čivgâstii
    čivgâđ+V+Der/d+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1:  čivgâdâm
    čivgâđ+V+Der/d+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3:  čiivgâd
    čivgâđ+V+Der/d+V+Ind+Prs+Du1:  čivgâdeen
    čivgâđ+V+Der/d+V+Ind+Prs+Pl3:  čivgâdeh
    čivgâđ+V+Der/d+V+Ind+Prs+ConNeg:  čiivgâd
    čivgâđ+V+Der/d+V+Ind+Prt+Sg1:  čivgâdim
    čivgâđ+V+Der/d+V+Ind+Prt+Sg3:  čivgâdij
    čivgâđ+V+Der/d+V+Ind+Prt+Pl3:  čivgâdii
    čivgâđ+V+Der/tt+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1:  čivgâttâm
    čivgâđ+V+Der/tt+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3:  čiivgât
    čivgâđ+V+Der/tt+V+Ind+Prs+Du1:  čivgâtteen
    čivgâđ+V+Der/tt+V+Ind+Prs+Pl3:  čivgâtteh
    čivgâđ+V+Der/tt+V+Ind+Prs+ConNeg:  čiivgât
    čivgâđ+V+Der/tt+V+Ind+Prt+Sg1:  čivgâttim
    čivgâđ+V+Der/tt+V+Ind+Prt+Sg3:  čivgâttij
    čivgâđ+V+Der/tt+V+Ind+Prt+Pl3:  čivgâttii
    čivgâđ+V+Der/l+V+Inf: čivgâliđ
    čivgâđ+V+Der/l+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: čivgâlâm
    čivgâđ+V+Der/l+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: čivgâl
    čivgâđ+V+Der/l+V+Ind+Prs+Du1: čivgâleen
    čivgâđ+V+Der/l+V+Ind+Prs+Pl3: čivgâleh
    čivgâđ+V+Der/l+V+Ind+Prs+ConNeg: čivgâl
    čivgâđ+V+Der/l+V+Ind+Prt+Sg1: čivgâlim
    čivgâđ+V+Der/l+V+Ind+Prt+Sg3: čivgâlij
    čivgâđ+V+Der/l+V+Ind+Prt+Pl3: čivgâlii
    čivgâđ+V+Der/InchL+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1:  čivgâškuáđám
    čivgâđ+V+Der/InchL+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3:  čivgâškuát
    čivgâđ+V+Der/InchL+V+Ind+Prs+Du1:  čivgâškyetteen
    čivgâđ+V+Der/InchL+V+Ind+Prs+Pl3:  [čivgâškyeteh, čivgâškyetih]
    čivgâđ+V+Der/InchL+V+Ind+Prs+ConNeg:  čivgâškyeđe
    čivgâđ+V+Der/InchL+V+Ind+Prt+Sg1:  čivgâškuottim
    čivgâđ+V+Der/InchL+V+Ind+Prt+Sg3:  čivgâškuođij
    čivgâđ+V+Der/InchL+V+Ind+Prt+Pl3:  čivgâškuottii
